New Jersey, session 222, A4061.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this section: Warehouse means a building greater than 100,000 square feet that stores cargo, goods, or products of any type on a short-term or long-term basis for later distribution to wholesale or retail customers, and includes, but is not limited to, a distribution center, flex-warehouse, or any other type of warehouse. b.  A municipal agency shall not approve an application for development to construct or expand a warehouse unless the Office of Local Planning Services in the Department of Community Affairs has issued a certificate of need for the project, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill).  A developer shall notify, in a form and manner determined by the Office of Local Planning Services, a municipal agency of the developers intent to submit an application for development to construct or expand a warehouse prior to applying for a certificate of need.  A developer shall secure a certificate of need prior to submitting the application for development and shall include it with that application. 2.    a.  As used in this section: Warehouse means a building greater than 100,000 square feet that stores cargo, goods, or products of any type on a short-term or long-term basis for later distribution to wholesale or retail customers, and includes, but is not limited to, a distribution center, flex-warehouse, or any other type of warehouse. b.  The Office of Local Planning Services in the Department of Community Affairs shall adopt rules and regulations pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), to effectuate the purposes of P.L.    , c.    (C. ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) by establishing standards and criteria meriting the issuance of a certificate of need for a proposed warehouse project, including a requirement that the developer provide proof prior to development that: (1)   at least 90 percent of the proposed warehouse space is leased, or otherwise committed to active warehouse use, if the warehouse is to house multiple businesses; or (2) 100 percent of the proposed warehouse space is leased, or otherwise committed to active warehouse use, if the warehouse is to house a single business. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.